Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 4
MOTOR CARRIERS OF TOWED MOTOR VEHICLES

40-10.1-401. Permit requirements.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate as a towing carrier in intrastate commerce without first having obtained a permit therefor from the commission in accordance with this article.

A person may apply for a permit under this part 4 to the commission in such form and with such information as the commission may require. Permits are valid for one year after the date of issuance.

The commission may deny an application or refuse to renew a permit under this part 4 of a person who has, within the immediately preceding five years, been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony or a towing-related offense. The commission may also deny an application under this part 4 or refuse to renew the permit of a towing carrier based upon a determination that the towing carrier or any of its owners, principals, officers, members, partners, or directors has not satisfied a civil penalty arising out of any administrative or enforcement action brought by the commission.

The commission may deny an application or refuse to renew a permit of a towing carrier under this part 4 based on a determination that there is good cause to believe the issuance of or renewal of the permit is not in the public interest. The determination is subject to appeal in accordance with commission rules.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 40-10.1-112 (4), the commission shall issue a permit to a towing carrier upon completion of the application and the filing of proof of workers' compensation insurance coverage in accordance with the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S., and with the financial responsibility requirements of this article and may attach to the permit and to the exercise of the rights granted by the permit such restrictions, terms, and conditions, including altering the rates and charges of the applicant, as are reasonably deemed necessary for the protection of the property of the public.

If a towing carrier violates this article 10.1, any other applicable provision of law, or any rule or order of the commission issued under this article 10.1 and as a result is ordered by a court or by the commission to pay a fine or civil penalty that the towing carrier subsequently fails to pay in full within the time prescribed for payment, and not before the decision imposing the fine or civil penalty becomes a final decision by the commission, then:

The towing carrier's permit is revoked immediately; and

The towing carrier, its owners, principals, officers, members, partners, and directors, and any other entity owned or operated by one or more of those owners, principals, officers, members, partners, or directors, may be disqualified from obtaining or renewing any operating authority under this article for a period of five years after the date on which the fine or civil penalty was due. The period of disqualification pursuant to this subparagraph (II) is in addition to, and not in lieu of, and does not affect, any other penalty or period of disqualification, including the period of disqualification specified in section 40-10.1-112 (4).

A towing carrier's facilities and vehicles are subject to inspection by the commission and by authorized personnel of the Colorado state patrol, which shall promptly report to the commission concerning any violations revealed by an inspection.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 411, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1327), ch. 217, p. 931, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2017:

IP(3)(b) and (3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1533, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2936, § 9, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 6 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act amending this section applies to towing carriers that applied for permits on, before, or after May 24, 2012.

40-10.1-402. Verification of authority - notice of requirement for designated license plates - rules.

The commission shall either:

Create a document that a person authorized to operate as a towing carrier under this article may use to verify to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent that the person is so authorized; or

Create a system to electronically verify to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent that the person is authorized to provide towing services under this part 4.

Upon request, the commission shall provide the document to the person with such authority or the electronic verification to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section and to enforce section 42-3-235.5, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1327), ch. 217, p. 933, § 3, effective May 24.

40-10.1-403. Towing task force - creation - rules - report - repeal.

The towing task force is hereby created within the department of regulatory agencies.

Repealed.

(2.5) (a) Beginning November 1, 2021, the task force consists of fourteen members, appointed as follows:

One member appointed by the governor to represent the commission;

One member appointed by the chief of the Colorado state patrol;

One member appointed by the governor to represent a towing association within the state with experience in consensual towing;

One member appointed by the governor to represent nonconsensual towing carriers;

One member appointed by the governor to represent mobile home owners in the state;

One member appointed by the governor to represent an association of motor carriers within Colorado as consumers of towing services;

One member appointed by the attorney general with experience enforcing the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of title 6;

One member appointed by the governor to represent people with disabilities;

One member who insures towing operations appointed by the governor to represent insurance companies within the state;

One member appointed by the governor to represent common interest communities;

One member appointed by the governor to represent local law enforcement agencies;

One member who owns private property and contracts for towing services appointed by the governor to represent consumers of towing services; and

Two members appointed by the governor to represent communities that might be disproportionately affected by nonconsensual towing, such as communities of color, immigrant communities, elderly communities, and rural communities.

A member appointed to the task force before November 1, 2021, may continue to serve on the task force on and after November 1, 2021, to serve the remainder of the member's term if the member continues to represent one of the groups required to be represented on the task force as of November 1, 2021, in accordance with subsection (2.5)(a) of this section.

If a member is unable to attend a meeting of the task force, the member may designate a person to fulfill the member's duties in lieu of the member for the meeting.

The members of the task force serve four-year terms; except that the members appointed or reappointed under subsections (2.5)(a)(I) to (2.5)(a)(VII) of this section serve initial terms of two years.

The members shall elect a chair from among their membership. The chair shall set the times and frequency of the task force's meetings; except that the task force shall meet no fewer than two times per year.

When promulgating or amending rules concerning rate regulation of tow carriers, the commission shall consult with the task force.

At the discretion of the commission, the staff of the commission shall consult with the task force concerning investigations of overcharges made by towing carriers in violation of this title.

The commission shall consider the recommendations of the task force.

By December 1 of each year, the commission shall make a report to the house of representatives transportation and local government committee, the house of representatives business affairs and labor committee, the senate business, labor, and technology committee, and the senate transportation and energy committee, or any successor committees. The report must:

Address the fees charged for and complaints arising from nonconsensual tows;

Contain the recommendations, including rule changes, of the task force, whether the recommendations were implemented with or without modification, and an analysis of the reasons why the commission made these decisions.

Include the analysis required in subsection (5)(c) of this section;

Include the task force's definitions of consensual tow and nonconsensual tow;

Include the range of dollar amounts considered when setting all rates related to charges by towing carriers for nonconsensual tows, including information considered for the minimum and maximum rates for all fees charged, the formulas for determining the actual cost and market rate for the final fees set for all rates, a summary of any public comment or feedback provided related to the rates set, and any other information the task force took into consideration when establishing all rates;

Include the times, including the shortest, mean, median, mode, and longest, to settle complaints made to the commission;

Include the categories of complaints and the number of complaints in each category; and

Include a list of the towing carriers that have been issued a permit, the number of valid complaints against each carrier, and the action taken by the commission in response to each valid complaint.

This subsection (4)(d) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

The task force has the following duties and powers:

To make comprehensive recommendations to the commission about the maximum rates that may be charged for the recovery, towing, and storage of a vehicle that has been towed without the owner's consent. The task force shall make comprehensive recommendations to the commission about the maximum rates after July 1, 2022, but no later than November 1, 2022.

To advise the commission or the staff of the commission concerning investigations of overcharges made by towing carriers in violation of this title.

To analyze and make recommendations to the commission about nonconsensual towing rates charged to the public. In analyzing nonconsensual rates, the task force shall take into account current consensual towing market rates and their relationship to nonconsensual towing rates.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2025. Before the repeal, the task force is scheduled for review in accordance with section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1031) ch. 14, p. 125, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(2), (3), (4)(c), (5)(a), and (6) amended and (2.5) and (4)(d) added, (HB 21-1283), ch. 472, p. 3384, § 3, effective July 7.

L. 2022:

(4)(d)(I)(C), (4)(d)(I)(D), (4)(d)(I)(E), (4)(d)(I)(F), (4)(d)(I)(G), and (4)(d)(I)(H) added and (5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2937, § 10, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective November 1, 2021. (See L. 2021, p. 3384.)

40-10.1-404. Repeal of part - subject to review.

This part 4 is repealed, effective September 1, 2025. Before the repeal, this part 4 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104 and subsection (2) of this section.

In conducting its review in accordance with section 24-34-104 (5) and in considering the factors set forth in section 24-34-104 (6)(b), the department of regulatory agencies shall consider the following in evaluating the performance of the commission with regard to regulating towing carriers:

With regard to complaints filed with the commission about towing services:

The number and nature of complaints filed each year; and

How the commission handles the complaints and how the complaints are resolved; and

Whether the towing industry and consumers would benefit from dispute resolution regarding complaints and whether such dispute resolution is being used in any other states.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1283), ch. 472, p. 3386, § 4, effective July 7.

L. 2022:

(3) repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2986, § 88, effective August 10.

40-10.1-405. Nonconsensual tows - rights of owners, operators, and lienholders - rules.

Towing fees.

Towing carriers shall prominently display at their place of business and on any website of the towing carrier the current maximum rates permitted by rule of the commission for each tow service provided by the towing carrier. The sign must include the following statement: "The maximum permitted rate is based upon rules of the public utilities commission, and if there are concerns or questions about these rates or the towing carrier, then call the public utilities commission consumer affairs hotline at 303-894-2070."

A towing carrier shall accept:

Cash;

Major credit cards; and

Other forms of payment required by rule of the commission.

The commission shall promulgate a rule defining what qualifies as a major credit card for the purposes of this subsection (1)(b).

A towing carrier shall not:

Charge storage fees for any twenty-four-hour period during which the towing carrier did not store the vehicle, but the towing carrier may charge, in accordance with section 42-4-2103 (3)(c), a prorated fee for any part of a twenty-four-hour period the towing carrier stored the vehicle; and

Charge or retain any fees not identified in the rules of the commission for the nonconsensual tow of a vehicle from private property.

Towing carrier document vehicle's condition and reason for tow - adequate illumination.

Before a towing carrier connects a towing vehicle to a vehicle without consent, the towing carrier shall document the vehicle's condition and the reason for the tow by:

Taking at least four photographs of the vehicle, with at least one photograph taken from the front, one photograph taken from the rear, one photograph taken from the driver's side, and one photograph taken from the passenger's side. These photographs must:

Show the entire vehicle from the required angle;

Have the vehicle fill at least three-fourths of the photograph, measured from side to side; and

Be rendered in a resolution of at least two thousand pixels by at least two thousand pixels.

Taking a photograph that shows the reason for the vehicle being towed without consent. The photograph must:

Show the position of the vehicle in relation to the reason, including any sign, that the vehicle was towed; and

Be rendered in a resolution of at least two thousand pixels by at least two thousand pixels.

Upon demand by an authorized or interested person, the towing carrier shall provide copies of the photographs required to be taken pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(I) or (2)(a)(II) of this section.

A rebuttable presumption that a towing carrier damaged a vehicle is created by evidence that:

A towing carrier's failure to produce a photograph of the reason for the tow in compliance with subsection (2)(b) of this section creates a rebuttable presumption that the towing carrier did not have authorization to tow a vehicle.

(A) The towing carrier has failed to produce photographs of the vehicle's condition in compliance with subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

(B) A vehicle has suffered damage.

During business hours or when a vehicle is being released, a towing carrier shall maintain an area at each storage facility with lighting that is adequate to allow a person to inspect a vehicle for damage prior to its release from storage.

Authorization and notice required for tows from private property.

A towing carrier shall not nonconsensually tow a vehicle from private property unless:

The vehicle is being repossessed by a creditor with a lien or security interest in the vehicle;

The removal is expressly ordered or authorized by a court order, an administrative order, or a peace officer or by operation of law;

The vehicle blocks a driveway or roadway enough to effectively obstruct a person's access to the driveway or roadway; or

The towing carrier has received permission to tow the vehicle, within the twenty-four hours immediately preceding the tow, from:

The owner of or lease holder of the private property;

A person subject to the "Colorado Common Interest Ownership Act", article 33.3 of title 38, if the private property is located within the boundaries of the person's area of operation; or

An agent of a person described in subsection (3)(a)(IV)(A) or (3)(a)(IV)(B) of this section; except that the towing carrier does not qualify as an agent with authority to grant permission under this subsection (3)(a).

The vehicle blocks a driveway or roadway enough to effectively obstruct a person's access to the driveway or roadway;

The vehicle is parked in violation of section 42-4-1208 (4) or in reserved parking for people with disabilities without displaying an identifying placard or an identifying plate, as those terms are defined in section 42-3-204 (1)(f) and (1)(g), that is currently valid or has been expired for no more than sixty days;

The vehicle is parked in or effectively obstructing a designated and marked fire zone;

The vehicle is occupying without permission or effectively obstructing access to or from an individually designated, rented, or purchased parking space of a resident; or

The vehicle is parked without displaying valid authorization in a parking lot marked for the exclusive use of residents.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(IV) of this section, a towing carrier shall not nonconsensually tow a vehicle from a parking space or common parking area without the towing carrier or property owner giving the vehicle owner or operator twenty-four hours' written notice, unless:

The towing carrier or property owner shall provide the notice described in subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section by placing a written notice on the windshield of the vehicle at least twenty-four hours before towing the vehicle.

The notice must state clearly:

That the vehicle will be towed without consent if the vehicle remains parked inappropriately;

A description of the inappropriate parking that has caused the notice to be given;

The time the vehicle will be towed if it is not moved to appropriate parking or the inappropriate parking has been corrected; and

That continuing to park inappropriately in the same manner may lead to the vehicle being towed without notice.

If the vehicle is parked a third or subsequent time in the same inappropriate manner that caused it to receive previous notices, the towing carrier or property owner need not give the notice required in subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section before towing the vehicle.

For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), a vehicle is parked inappropriately when it is parked in a manner that:

Violates the procedures necessary to obtain authorization to park in the lot or space;

Fails to comply with the property owner's signs or the agreements of the tenants; or

Violates a statute, rule, ordinance, or resolution of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(A) The vehicle owner or operator has received two previous notices for parking inappropriately in the same manner;

(B) The vehicle is being repossessed by a creditor with a lien or security interest in the vehicle;

(C) The removal is expressly ordered or authorized by a court order, an administrative order, or a peace officer or by operation of law;

In order for a towing carrier to conduct a nonconsensual tow under subsection (3)(b)(I)(G) or (3)(b)(I)(H) of this section, the property owner must have posted signage visible and facing the driver at each entryway into a parking area indicating that parking spaces are designated for one or more specified residents and that a vehicle parked without authorization is subject to being towed. The sign must also contain the international towing symbol no smaller than four inches by four inches and be permanently mounted in a position that is no lower than five feet and no higher than eight feet.

Notice, disclosures, and signs.

In connection with a nonconsensual tow, the towing carrier shall provide, upon request, evidence of the towing carrier's commercial liability insurance coverage, including cargo liability coverage, garage keeper's liability coverage, if applicable, and motor vehicle liability coverage, to an authorized or interested person.

A towing carrier shall maintain a clearly visible sign at the entrance to the storage facility holding a nonconsensually towed vehicle. The sign must:

State the name of the business, telephone number, and hours of operation;

State: "If a vehicle is nonconsensually towed from private property, the owner may retrieve the contents of the vehicle even if the owner does not pay the towing carrier's fees. If the owner fills out the appropriate form, the owner may retrieve the vehicle after paying a reduced fee, but the owner still owes the towing carrier the balance of those fees."

Be no less than two square feet in size;

Have lettering not less than two inches in height;

Have lettering that contrasts sharply in color with the background on which the letters are placed; and

Be printed in English.

Upon request, a towing carrier shall provide to an authorized or interested person an itemized bill showing each charge and the rate for each fee that the authorized or interested person has incurred as a result of a nonconsensual tow.

Upon request, a towing carrier shall disclose accepted forms of payment, including those required to be accepted in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this section.

If a towing carrier has nonconsensually towed a vehicle from private property, the towing carrier shall give the authorized or interested person that is retrieving the vehicle a written notice of the person's ability to make a complaint to the commission. The notice:

Must be written in a conspicuous typeface and font on the invoice, the receipt, and the bill for the tow; and

Must not be in a typeface or font that is smaller than the other numbers or words on the receipt or bill, as applicable.

A towing carrier shall not perform a nonconsensual tow of a vehicle, other than an abandoned motor vehicle as defined in section 42-4-2102 (1), from private property normally used for parking unless:

Notice of the parking regulations was provided to the vehicle operator when the vehicle entered the private property and parked; and

Notice that any vehicle parked in violation of the regulations is subject to tow at the vehicle owner's expense was provided to the vehicle operator when the vehicle entered the private property and parked.

A property owner with tenants shall provide the notice described in this subsection (4)(f) by issuing each tenant a written document containing any applicable parking regulations before the regulations are adopted or amended or before the person agrees to be a tenant.

A towing carrier that enters into an agreement with a property owner to nonconsensually tow vehicles from the property shall post signs that:

Are no less than one square foot in size;

Have lettering not less than one inch in height;

Have lettering that contrasts with the background on which the letters are placed;

State: "Authorized Parking Only";

Include the name and telephone number of the towing carrier authorized to perform tows from the private property;

Are printed in English;

Are placed at the entrance to the private property, face outward toward the street, and are visible prior to entering and upon entering the private property;

Are placed inside the area used for parking, face toward the parking spaces, and, if the private property is not provided for residential parking and has more than ten freestanding lampposts on the property, are posted on each lamppost or posted upright near each lamppost;

Are not obstructed or placed in such a manner that prevents visibility; and

Are not placed higher than eight feet or lower than three feet from the ground surface closest to the sign's placement.

The towing carrier shall retain evidence, including photographs of the relevant signs, of giving the notices and disclosures required in subsection (4)(f) of this section for three years after the date of completion of a nonconsensual tow and provide the evidence to the commission or an enforcement official upon request.

No mechanic's liens on contents.

Notwithstanding section 38-20-105, a towing carrier that nonconsensually tows a vehicle does not have a mechanic's lien on the contents of the vehicle to cover the cost of towing the vehicle.

If an authorized or interested person requests that a towing carrier return the contents of a vehicle that was towed without consent within thirty days after the postmarked date the notice was mailed in accordance with section 42-4-2103 (4) or the date the operator received notice that no record exists for the motor vehicle, the towing carrier shall immediately retrieve or allow the authorized or interested person to retrieve the vehicle's contents. This subsection (5)(b) does not apply to the contents of a vehicle if the contents of the vehicle are subject to a hold order issued by a court, district attorney, law enforcement agency, or peace officer.

The towing carrier shall immediately retrieve a vehicle that has been nonconsensually towed or allow the owner to retrieve the vehicle if:

The owner pays fifteen percent of the fees, not to exceed sixty dollars, owed the towing carrier for the nonconsensual tow; and

The authorized or interested person is not a lienholder or insurance company.

For an authorized or interested person to retrieve a vehicle without paying the towing carrier the total amount owed to the towing carrier, the authorized or interested person must sign a form affirming that the authorized or interested person owes the towing carrier payment for fees that comply with this article 10.1, part 21 of article 4 of title 42, or article 20 of title 38. Knowingly providing false information on the form is unlawful. Signing this form does not prohibit a vehicle owner from filing a complaint with the commission or pursuing other remedies. The towing carrier may use the form to take reasonable actions to collect the debt, including initiating a court action or using a collection agency. The department shall:

Create the form;

Give the form the following title: "Towed Vehicle Release Notice: Retrieval with Payment Owed"; and

Provide the form on the public utilities commission website for towing carriers to retrieve and use.

Releasing the vehicle upon request.

A towing carrier shall release a nonconsensually towed vehicle in accordance with subsection (5)(c) of this section.

A towing carrier shall not assess a drop charge to release the vehicle after the vehicle is hooked up to the tow truck but before the vehicle is removed from the property.

If approached by an authorized or interested person before the vehicle is removed from private property, the towing carrier shall notify the authorized or interested person that the towing carrier is required to release the vehicle upon request of the authorized or interested person.

Upon request by the authorized or interested person, the towing carrier shall stop any tow in progress before the vehicle is removed from private property.

No towing for expired registration. Unless the tow is based on an order given by a peace officer, a towing carrier shall not tow a vehicle from private property because the rear license plate of the vehicle or the record obtained using the system described in section 42-4-2103 (3)(c)(III) indicates that the vehicle's registration has expired.

Towing carrier responsibility. For a nonconsensual tow, the towing carrier is responsible for the security and safety of the towed vehicle until it is released to an authorized or interested person.

Applicability. This section does not apply to:

A tow ordered by a peace officer or technician directed by a peace officer in the course and scope of the officer's or technician's duties; or

A tow from a parking space that serves a business if:

The parking space is not in a common parking area; and

The parking space is on commercial real estate, as defined in section 38-22.5-102 (2).

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.

40-10.1-406. Failure to comply.

No fees.

If a towing carrier fails to comply with this article 10.1, article 20 of title 38, or part 18 or 21 of article 4 of title 42 or any rule promulgated under this article 10.1 or part 18 or 21 of article 4 of title 42, the towing carrier:

Shall not charge or retain any fees or charges for the services performed with respect to the vehicle; and

Shall return to the authorized or interested person any fees it collected with respect to the vehicle.

It is an affirmative defense in any action to collect towing fees that:

The vehicle was towed nonconsensually; and

The towing carrier failed to comply with section 40-10.1-405.

Attorney fees. An authorized or interested person seeking reimbursement for damages may recover from the towing carrier reasonable attorney fees if:

The vehicle was towed nonconsensually;

A court holds that:

The towing carrier failed to comply with this article 10.1, article 20 of title 38, or part 18 or 21 of article 4 of title 42 or any rule promulgated under this article 10.1 or part 18 or 21 of article 4 of title 42, and this failure caused damages, including economic damages, to the vehicle owner or lienholder; or

The towing carrier damaged a vehicle while connecting it to a towing vehicle, while possessing the vehicle, or while returning the vehicle to an authorized or interested person; and

The authorized or interested person demanded reimbursement for the suffered damages and the towing carrier refused to reimburse the authorized or interested person for the damages.

Damages recovered for party in interest. In a court action arising from a nonconsensual tow, any authorized or interested person may recover the damages suffered by another authorized or interested person from a towing carrier if the person who recovers the damages reimburses the other authorized or interested person for the damages suffered by the authorized or interested person. A court may issue an order implementing this subsection (3).

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.

40-10.1-407. Records - rules.

A towing carrier shall record the following information for each nonconsensual tow:

The unique serial number of the tow record or invoice;

The name, address, towing carrier permit number, and telephone number of the towing carrier;

The address and telephone number of the storage facility used by the towing carrier;

The make, model, year, complete vehicle identification number, and license plate number, if available, of the towed vehicle;

The origin address of the tow, the destination address of the tow, and the one-way mileage between the two addresses;

The printed name, address, telephone number, and signature of the person authorizing the tow;

The printed name and signature of the tow truck driver;

An itemized invoice of all towing charges assessed;

The signature of the person to whom the vehicle is released; except that the towing carrier may write "refused to sign" if the person to whom the vehicle is released refuses to sign the release document;

The date and time of any of the following, if performed:

Hooking the vehicle to the tow truck;

Unhooking the vehicle from the tow truck;

Completing the tow;

Notifying the appropriate law enforcement agency;

Placing the vehicle in storage; and

Releasing the towed vehicle from storage; and

Any other information required by rule of the commission.

A towing carrier shall record the information required to be recorded by subsection (1) of this section before the action to which it refers is performed, unless impracticable due to safety concerns. If the safety concerns delay recording the information required by subsection (1) of this section, the towing carrier shall record the information as soon as reasonably possible.

A towing carrier shall retain the information required in subsection (1) of this section for three years after the tow commenced.

Within forty-eight hours after a request, a towing carrier shall provide the information required to be recorded by subsection (1) of this section to an authorized or interested person.

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.

40-10.1-408. Kickbacks prohibited.

A towing carrier shall not pay money or other valuable consideration for the privilege of nonconsensually towing vehicles.

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.

40-10.1-409. Violators subject to penalties.

A towing carrier that violates this part 4 is subject to the penalties provided in section 40-10.1-114.

A violation of this part 4 is a deceptive trade practice under section 6-1-105 (1)(ttt) and is subject to enforcement by the attorney general's office in addition to the enforcement described in this section.

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.

40-10.1-410. Towing rules.

Upon making a finding that a towing practice harms the public interest, the commission may promulgate rules, as necessary, to stop or change the towing practice that harms the public interest.

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2938, § 11, effective August 10.